Hawaii, session 2026, SB2826.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the counties to open additional voter service centers for in-person voting on election day. The sum shall be allocated as follows: (1)  $ to the city and county of Honolulu; (2)  $ to the county of Hawaii; (3)  $ to the county of Kauai; and (4)  $ to the county of Maui. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the city and county of Honolulu, county of Hawaii, county of Kauai, and county of Maui, as applicable, for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the office of elections to print and mail the digital voter information guide, as identified in section 11-122, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to all registered voters. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the office of elections for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the office of elections to support a public outreach and engagement campaign to encourage greater voter participation. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the office of elections for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________